Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1488
Landlord's successor in interest; rights and obligations.

Upon the termination of a landlord's interest in a mobile home park and compliance with section 76-1487, the landlord shall be relieved of any further liability with respect to the rental deposit. The landlord's successor in interest shall have all the rights and obligations of the landlord with respect to the rental deposits, except that if the tenant does not object to the amount stated in the notice required by subdivision (1) of section 76-1487 within twenty days after receipt of the notice, the obligations of the landlord's successor to return the deposit shall be limited to the amount contained in the notice.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 39.